Illinois, session 104th, HB4207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.88 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)7    Sec. 356z.88. Coronary calcium scan and scoring.8    (a) An individual or group policy of accident and health 9insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or 10after January 1, 2028 and is subject to this Code shall provide 11coverage for a medically necessary coronary calcium scan and 12scoring if:13        (1) the individual is between 40 and 75 years of age;14        (2) the scan is ordered by a licensed health care 15    provider; and16        (3) the provider has conducted and documented a 17    cardiovascular risk assessment demonstrating clinical 18    appropriateness consistent with evidence-based 19    guidelines.20    (b) Coverage shall be provided at intervals consistent 21with evidence-based clinical guidelines and shall not be 22subject to more restrictive limitations than other diagnostic 23imaging services covered under the policy.  HB4207 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1    (c) For policies subject to cost-sharing requirements, the 2cost sharing for a coronary calcium scan and scoring shall not 3exceed the cost sharing applied to comparable diagnostic 4imaging services.5    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 6coverage in a manner inconsistent with federal law.  7    Section 10. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 8amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 9    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)10    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 11    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 12the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 13141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 14152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 15155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 16356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 17356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 18356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 19356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 20356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 21356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 22356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 23356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 24356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61,   HB4207 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 2356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 3356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 4356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 5367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 6370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, 7and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and 8Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, 9XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.10    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 11for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 12Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 13are deemed to be "domestic companies":14        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 15    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;16        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 17    State; or18        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 19    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 20    of this State, except a corporation subject to 21    substantially the same requirements in its state of 22    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 23    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.24    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 25acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 26pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,  HB4207 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 2    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 3    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 4    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 5    acquisition of control takes effect;6        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 7    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 8    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 9    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 10    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 11    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 12    other acquisition of control;13        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 14    following information:15            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 16        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 17        Organization sought to be acquired;18            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 19        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 20        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 21        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 22        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 23        forma financial statements reflecting projected 24        combined operation for a period of 2 years;25            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 26        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation   HB4207 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 2        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and3            (D) such other information as the Director shall 4        require.5    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 6Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 7any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 8enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 9maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 10to its health care certificates).11    (e) In considering any management contract or service 12agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 13Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 14specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 15take into account the effect of the management contract or 16service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 17and the financial condition of the health maintenance 18organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 19into account the effect of the management contract or service 20agreement on competition.21    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 22Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 23Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 24defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 25Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 26group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge   HB4207 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:2        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 3    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 4    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 5    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 6    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 7    not be less than one year); and8        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 9    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 10    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 11    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 12    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 13    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 14    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 15    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 16    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 17    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 18    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 19    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 20    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 21    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 22    plan years.23    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 24statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 25describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 26and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to   HB4207 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 2to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 3profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 4unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 5or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 6experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 7the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 8enrollment unit.9    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 10Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 11contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 12refund authorized under this Section.13    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 14if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 15accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 17Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 18adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 19(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 211-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 22eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 241-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 26103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff.   HB4207 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b11-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 2eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 3eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 4104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff. 51-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 6    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 7changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 8    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)9    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. 10    (a) The medical assistance program shall (i) provide the 11post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 12policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 13the coverage required under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 14356x, 356z.6, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 15356z.35, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 16356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.71, and 356z.75, and 356z.80, 17356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be 18subject to the provisions of Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 19356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance 20Code, and (iii) be subject to the provisions of subsection 21(d-5) of Section 10 of the Network Adequacy and Transparency 22Act.23    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 24the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance   HB4207 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1Code. 2    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 3rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 4any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 5of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 6with Section 5-5e. 7    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 8Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 9ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 10post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 11no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 12    (b)(1) Subject to appropriation and federal approval, the 13Department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance 14program for a medically necessary coronary artery calcium scan 15and scoring for an eligible individual who: 16        (A) is between 40 and 75 years of age;17        (B) is assessed by a licensed health care provider as 18    having moderate or greater risk of atherosclerotic 19    cardiovascular disease based on a documented 20    cardiovascular risk assessment consistent with nationally 21    recognized evidence-based clinical guidelines;22        (C) does not have a prior diagnosis of coronary artery 23    disease; and 24        (D) has not received a covered coronary artery calcium 25    scan within the previous 5 years, unless medically 26    necessary as determined by the Department.   HB4207 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 15812 BAB 29011 b1    (2) Coverage under this subsection shall be provided 2without cost sharing to the beneficiary. 3    (3) The Department may adopt reasonable utilization 4controls consistent with other diagnostic imaging services 5covered under the medical assistance program. 6    (4) Implementation of coverage under this subsection shall 7occur only to the extent that federal financial participation 8is available and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare 9and Medicaid Services. 10(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, eff. 121-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-73, 13eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 14104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.)